California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 74.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74929.

(a) Prior to the implementation referendum conducted by the secretary, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary the amount that the secretary deems necessary to defray the expenses in creating the commission, including, but not limited to, preparing the necessary producer and vintner lists and conducting the referendum.

(b) Any funds remaining after paying expenses shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary.

(c) The commission may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary that were used in carrying out this article and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 75.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [74951. - 74957.]

74951.

(a) Prior to the beginning of each marketing season or as soon thereafter as possible, the commission shall establish an assessment rate for the marketing season.

(b) The assessment rate for producers shall not exceed 1 percent of the gross dollar value of winegrapes marketed by producers to vintners. If a producer sells winegrapes for a specified sum in a bona fide sale, the gross dollar amount of this sum is the gross dollar value of the winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74951.1.

(a) The petition for a referendum to establish a local commission shall set forth the assessment rate which shall become effective during the first marketing season in which the local commission is operative. Thereafter, prior to the beginning of each marketing season or as soon thereafter as possible, the local commission shall establish an assessment rate for the marketing season. Assessment rates set by local commissions which vote to continue in operation after the certification of the commission shall be independent of, and additional to, any assessment rate established by the commission.

(b) The assessment rate for producers shall not exceed 1 percent of the gross dollar value of winegrapes grown in the producer region and marketed by producers to vintners. If a producer sells winegrapes for a specified sum in a bona fide sale, the gross dollar amount of this sum is the gross dollar value of the winegrapes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 854, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

74952.5.

(a) Unless exempted by this chapter, the commission shall levy the assessment on the producer if he or she does any of the following:

(1) Sells to a vintner or to a handler for processing.

(2) Contracts or otherwise arranges with a vintner for processing into wine, with the producer retaining ownership of the wine for sale other than in bottled form.

(3) Is a member of an agricultural nonprofit cooperative association for processing.

(4) Processes winegrapes that he or she has grown and that are included in the petition specified in Section 74922.1.

(b) If a producer delivers winegrapes to a vintner or handler for processing without selling them to the vintner or handler, the “weighted average producer returns per ton” by district as published in the most recent Final Grape Crush Report issued annually for the current marketing season by the department shall be used as the basis for determining the gross dollar value of the winegrapes for the purpose of determining the amount of the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 689, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74952.7.

(a) Any producer who meets any of the requirements specified by subdivision (b) may apply to the secretary prior to the formation of the commission, or apply to the commission after its formation, for, and, if found eligible, shall, at the discretion of the commission, receive either an exemption from, or a refund of, the assessment.

(b) A producer shall be eligible to claim an exemption from, or refund of, the assessment for winegrapes grown by the producer, with regard to which the producer does any of the following:

(1) Processes winegrapes that are grown by the producer. However, the producer shall not be eligible for an exemption or refund of assessments on winegrapes that are grown and sold, but a producer who is also a vintner, and who commercially sells less than 25 tons of winegrapes in a marketing season, is not subject to assessment.

(2) Sells to a related vintner or a related handler.

(3) Contracts or otherwise arranges with a related vintner for processing into wine, with the producer retaining ownership of the wine for sale other than in bottled form.

(4) Is a producer who is also a vintner and who contracts or otherwise arranges with a nonrelated vintner for processing his or her winegrapes into wine and retains ownership of the wine for sale other than in bottled form.

(c) For the purpose of this section, an agricultural nonprofit cooperative association is not a “related vintner” or a “related handler.” A vintner or handler is a “related vintner” or “related handler” if any one of the following relationships exists:

(1) The producer has an ownership interest in the vintner or handler processing the winegrapes. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “ownership interest” does not include an interest that is limited to ownership of shares of stock in a vintner or handler that is a publicly traded stock corporation, unless the ownership interest includes a right to management or control in the corporation.

(2) The vintner or handler processing the winegrapes has an ownership interest in the producer.

(3) The producer, or any person controlling the producer, if the producer is not a natural person, is a member of the immediate family of the vintner or handler processing the winegrapes, or of any person controlling the vintner or handler, if the vintner or handler is not a natural person. For the purpose of this paragraph, “member of the immediate family” means parents, spouses, and children.

(d) In order to be eligible for the exemption or refund, the producer shall file a claim with the secretary prior to formation of the commission and with the commission after its formation on a form prescribed by the commission attesting to the facts establishing the producer’s right to the exemption or refund. The secretary or the commission shall then determine whether the claim should be granted.

(e) The commission shall serve written notice on the claimant of its decision within 30 days of receipt of the claim. All approved claims shall be subject to verification through an independent audit of the claimant and the related vintner’s or handler’s business records by the commission or its duly authorized agent or, in the case of a local commission, by the secretary or his or her duly authorized agent. The local commission shall not serve as the secretary’s duly authorized agent for purposes of auditing business records.

(f) Every producer receiving an exemption or refund shall, in addition to the requirements of Section 74954, maintain sales invoices, and all other business documents specified by the commission as necessary to verify the claim. The records shall be preserved for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent or, in the case of a local commission, by the secretary or his or her duly authorized agent. The local commission shall not serve as the secretary’s duly authorized agent for purposes of records inspection.

(g) No claim of exemption or refund shall be approved by the commission after two years from the date the assessment was due. Failure to file a claim of exemption or refund within that two-year period constitutes a waiver of all claims or demands for an exemption or refund against the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 76.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74953.

This chapter shall not apply to winegrapes produced only for a producer’s home use. However, any producer claiming this exemption shall file an affidavit with the commission establishing the manner in which the winegrapes are used. The commission shall then determine whether the affidavit should be approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74954.

Every producer subject to this chapter and every vintner who purchases winegrapes from or processes winegrapes for producers shall maintain normal commercial records of all winegrapes grown for market or processed. The records shall be in simple form and contain information as the commission shall prescribe. The records shall be preserved for a period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand of the commission or its duly authorized agent or, in the case of a local commission, by the secretary or his or her duly authorized agent. The local commission shall not serve as the secretary’s duly authorized agent for purposes of records inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 77.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74954.5.

Producers subject to this chapter shall provide to local commissions the names of the vintners who purchase winegrapes from or process winegrapes for the producers. Vintners shall provide to local commissions the names of the producers subject to this chapter from whom they purchase or for whom they process winegrapes and the amount of assessment remitted to the local commission for each producer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74955.

All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the secretary from producers or vintners, and all lists of producers in the possession of the commission or the secretary are confidential and shall not be disclosed except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter. Information on volume shipments, commodity value, and other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports made to the commission or aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other information which is requested from the commission, except individual producer or vintner information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 79.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74956.

Any assessment levied by the commission, pursuant to this chapter, is a personal debt of every person so assessed and is due and payable to the commission within 30 days after the date the vintner deducts the assessment from the amounts paid by the vintner to the producer. The vintner first acquiring the grapes being assessed shall deduct the assessments from amounts paid by the vintner to the producer and shall be a trustee of the funds until they are paid to the commission. The vintner responsible for deducting the assessment may deduct and retain an amount not in excess of that reasonably necessary to cover the actual cost of services provided by the vintner, as determined by the commission. Failure of a vintner to collect the assessment from a producer shall not exempt the vintner from liability nor relieve the producer of the obligation to pay the assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 689, Sec. 11.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74957.

Any person who fails to file a return, or remit or pay any assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be due and, in addition, 112 percent interest per month on the unpaid balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [74971. - 74974.]

74971.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to do any of the following:

(a) Render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(b) When engaged in the marketing, processing, or other activities related to winegrapes, to fail or refuse to furnish the commission or its duly authorized agents, information concerning the name and address of the persons to whom winegrapes were delivered or from whom winegrapes have been received.

(c) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be maintained under this chapter.

(d) Refuse to render a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 689, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74972.

The commission shall establish procedures for the purpose of according individuals aggrieved by its acts or determinations an informal hearing. Appeals from decisions of the commission may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court. Pending disposition of any appeal and judicial review, the parties shall abide by the acts or determinations of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 80.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74973.

(a) The commission may commence civil action and utilize all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties and the obtaining of injunctive relief or specific performance regarding this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(b) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding the commodity subject to this chapter until there is full compliance and satisfaction of the judgment. Upon a favorable judgment for the commission, it shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any reasonable attorney’s fees and other actual related costs. Venue may be established at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 689, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74974.

Suspension or termination of this chapter in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 74991) shall not result in any of the following:

(a) Affecting, waiving, or termination of any right, duty, obligation, or liability which may have arisen or may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter.

(b) Releasing, condoning, or dismissal of any violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [74991. - 74996.]

74991.

During the fifth year of operation of the commission, the commission shall cause a referendum to be conducted among producers to determine whether the commission shall be reapproved and continued to operate. A favorable vote shall be found if the secretary determines from the referendum that a majority of the eligible producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of continuing the operations. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has been given, he or she shall so certify that result. If the secretary finds that a favorable vote has not been given, the secretary shall so certify and declare the operations of the commission suspended upon expiration of the marketing season. No bond or security shall be required for any referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 81.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74992.

Following an initial favorable referendum , a referendum shall be conducted by the commission every fifth year thereafter unless a referendum is conducted as a result of a petition pursuant to this article. In that case, the referendum shall be every fifth year following the industry petitioned referendum following procedures provided in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 689, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

74993.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that this chapter be suspended. However, any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing season.

(b) Alternatively, the secretary may be petitioned to suspend this chapter. The petition shall be signed by 20 percent of the producers by number who produced not less than 20 percent of the volume of winegrapes in the immediately preceding marketing season. The secretary shall hold a hearing on the petition after receiving it.

(c) The secretary shall, upon receipt of the recommendation to suspend this chapter from the commission, or may, after holding the hearing on the petition to suspend this chapter, hold a referendum among producers to determine if the commission shall be suspended. However, the secretary shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows by the weight of evidence that this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes.

(d) The secretary shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures as may be necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the referendum period, the secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. If at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the lists established by the secretary participate in the referendum, the secretary shall suspend this chapter if he or she finds either of the following has occurred:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers who voted in the referendum, voted in favor of suspension; and the producers so voting marketed a majority of the total quantity of winegrapes marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who participated in the referendum.

(2) A majority of the producers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension; and the producers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of winegrapes marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 82.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74994.

(a) The secretary shall terminate the commission at the end of the current marketing season if the secretary finds that termination is requested in writing, within a 90-day period, by at least 51 percent of the eligible producers that are directly affected that market at least 51 percent of the volume of the product.

(b) The person or persons originating the request shall file a written notice with the secretary in a manner that establishes the date the request is initiated. Any person may withdraw his or her name from the petition requesting the termination prior to the time the request is presented to the secretary.

(c) The signatures to the petition requesting termination need not all be appended to one sheet of paper. Each person signing the petition shall add his or her signature and business address. If no business address is given, a designation of the place of business shall be given that will enable the location to be readily ascertained.

(d) The petition shall bear a copy of the notice of intention. Signatures shall be secured within the time limit specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 83.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

74995.

After the effective date of suspension of this chapter, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and any and all funds remaining held by the commission and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating the commission shall be returned on a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing season. However, if the commission finds that the amounts so returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to these persons, any funds shall be paid into an appropriate program conducted by the University of California or the California State University, another state agency, or a federal agency which deals with the purposes of this chapter. If no program exists, the funds shall be paid into the State Treasury as unclaimed trust funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

74996.

Upon suspension of this chapter, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers and vintners affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1287, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. California Egg Commission [75001. - 75176.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [75001. - 75007.]

75001.

Eggs and egg products constitute one of the basic, natural foods of the diet. The maintenance and expansion of existing markets and the development of new and improved markets and uses are vital and necessary to prevent the further decline in per capita consumption of eggs and egg products; to protect the welfare of the egg producer; and to provide employment for the work force. The Legislature also recognizes that this maintenance and expansion of the market for eggs is vital to the economy of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75002.

The protection and enhancement of the reputation of eggs and egg products in intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets, and the elimination of unreasonable and unnecessary economic waste of the agricultural wealth of this state is an essential aspect of the activities authorized in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 243, Sec. 1.   Effective July 23, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

75003.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to aid in the handling of eggs and egg products, to develop more efficient and equitable methods in handling, and to maintain job security for workers in the egg industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75004.

The production of eggs and egg products in this state and the marketing of eggs and egg products in this state, regardless of their point of origin is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 243, Sec. 2.   Effective July 23, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

75005.

A commission form of administration created by this chapter is designed to deal with the broad fields of advertising, promotion, education, economic research and marketing research.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75006.

No action taken by the commission, or by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the rules and regulations adopted under this chapter, is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 454, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75007.

The benefits conferred by the activities authorized pursuant to this chapter extend to those segments of the egg industry doing business within this state. Insofar as out-of-state handlers benefit from the programs and activities authorized in accordance with this chapter, they may be obligated to bear their fair share of the burden and shall comply with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [75021. - 75036.]

75021.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75022.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 211.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

75023.

“Commission” means the California Egg Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75024.

“Commissioner” means any member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75025.

“Director” means the Director of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75026.

“Districts” mean the following:

(a) District 1 (Southern California) consists of the Counties of San Diego, Imperial, Orange, Riverside, San Bernardino, Los Angeles, Ventura, Santa Barbara, Kern, and San Luis Obispo.

(b) District 2 (Northern California) consists of all counties not included in District 1.

The boundaries of any district may be changed by a two-thirds vote of the commission, which is concurred in by the director, to ensure proper representation by handlers. The boundaries need not coincide with county lines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 857, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

75027.

“Eggs” means eggs from domesticated chickens handled in California for human consumption in shell egg form, except those eggs used for hatchery purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75027.5.

(a) “Egg products” means eggs that are not sold or used for consumption in shell egg form and that have been processed into a nonshell form.

(b) For purposes of this section, “processed” means cut, diced, sliced, peeled, seasoned, salted, sugared, preserved, frozen, dried, liquified, strained, pasteurized, separated into yolks and whites (whether or not in natural proportions), or blended or mixed with not more than 25 percent nonegg substances or ingredients.

(c) Food products that contain less than 75 percent egg substances, or that historically have not been considered egg products, shall not be considered an “egg product” for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

75028.

“Ex officio member” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75029.

“Handle” means to engage in the business of a handler.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75030.

(a) “Handler” means the first person who sorts, grades, candles, or packages eggs, or who processes eggs into egg products, or who markets eggs or egg products in California that he or she has produced, purchased, or acquired from another person, or that he or she is marketing on behalf of another person, whether as owner, agent, employee, broker, or otherwise. When the handler is a corporation, all of the directors and officers of the corporation in their capacity as individuals shall be included, and any liability for failure to collect or make payment of assessments for which a corporate handler may be subject pursuant to this chapter shall include identical liability upon each individual director or officer of the corporation. “Handler” does not include a retailer, except a retailer who purchases or acquires eggs or egg products from any producer, handler, or broker that were not previously subject to assessment by the commission.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, any handler that owns, controls, or is affiliated with any other person engaged in the handling of eggs in any marketing year shall be considered to be the handler of all eggs handled by that person.

“Affiliate” or “affiliated with” means a person who directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under the common direction and control of another person.

“Control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of any person.

(c) All references to “handler” in this chapter, except for Article 3 (commencing with Section 75051), Article 5 (commencing with Section 75111), subdivision (a) of Section 75132, and Article 8 (commencing with Section 75171), but not including Sections 75175 and 75176, includes California handlers and out-of-state handlers, unless otherwise specified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

75030.5.

“Out-of-state handler” means any person located in another state who handles eggs or egg products, as specified in Section 75030, in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75031.

“Market” or “marketing” means to sell or otherwise cause to be distributed eggs or egg products into commercial channels of trade resulting in the sale of eggs or egg products in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 454, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

75032.

“Marketing research” means any research relating to the sale of eggs or egg products.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75033.

“Marketing season” or “fiscal year” means the period beginning January 1 of each year and extending through December 31 of the same year. However, the 1984–85 marketing season shall commence within 30 days after the election of the first commission members as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 75111).

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75033.5.

“Person” means an individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, cooperative, limited liability company, firm, or other business entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 384, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

75035.

“Producer” means any person who is engaged in the business of producing, or causing to be produced, eggs or egg products for market.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

75036.

“Secondary handler” means any person who purchases from a handler, eggs or egg products that were previously subject to assessment under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 454, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Egg Commission [75051. - 75070.]

75051.

There is in the state government the California Egg Commission. The commission shall be composed of eight handler members and one public member. Of the handler members, four shall be elected by and from handlers from District 1, three shall be elected by and from handlers from District 2, and one at-large handler shall be elected who pays assessments exclusively on eggs or egg products produced outside of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75052.

The public member shall be appointed to the commission by the director from the nominees recommended by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75053.

The director, and other appropriate individuals and organizations, as determined by the commission, are ex officio members of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75054.

(a) The director may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function which is determined by the director not to be in the public interest or which is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease the activities or functions or to make the corrections as required by the director, the director may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the time that the cessation or correction of activities or functions required by the director has been accomplished by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75055.

(a) Actions of the commission in violation of a written notice have no legal force or effect. The director, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions which are the subject of the written notice.

(b) Upon service of the written notice, the director shall notify the commission, in writing, of the specific acts which he or she determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter and his or her reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and he or she may make recommendations that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75056.

The commission may bring an action for judicial relief from the director’s written notice, and the director may bring an action for judicial relief from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75057.

The commission shall reimburse the director for all expenditures incurred by the director in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities under this chapter. However, the court may, if it finds that the director acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for payment of the director’s legal costs with regard to the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75058.

(a) Three alternate handler members, one from each district and one who pays assessments exclusively on eggs or egg products produced outside of California, shall be elected in the same manner as the handler members.

(b) Under procedures established by the commission, any alternate handler member may serve in place of any absent handler member on the commission regardless of whether the alternate handler was chosen from the district the absent handler member represents and shall have all the rights, privileges, and powers of the handler member when serving on the commission.

(c) In the event of death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a handler member, the alternate handler shall act as a handler member on the commission until a qualified successor is elected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75059.

(a) Any vacancy on the commission occurring for any reason, including the failure of any elected member or elected alternate member to continue in his or her position due to a change in status making him or her ineligible to serve, or due to death, removal, resignation, or disqualification, shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by appointment by a majority vote of the commission.

(b) The person so appointed shall fulfill all the requirements set forth in this article for the member or the alternate member whose office he or she is to fill.

(c) The qualification of any person to fill a vacancy on the commission shall be certified by the commission, in writing, to the director. The director shall notify the commission if he or she determines that the person is not qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75060.

(a) Any handler member or his or her alternate shall be an individual, partner, or employee of a handler who has a financial interest in handling eggs or egg products for market. Not more than two handler members on the commission and not more than one handler member in any district shall be employed by or represent the same corporation, firm, partnership, association, or business organization.

(b) Handler members and alternates shall meet the requirements of this section during their entire term of office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1093, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

75061.

The public member or his or her alternate has all the powers, rights, responsibilities, and privileges of any other member on the commission.

The public member shall not have any financial interest in the egg industry during the entire term of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 531, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75062.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the term of office of the elected commissioners is three years from the date of their election and until their successors are qualified and elected.

(b) With respect to the first elected members of the commission, two of the handlers from District 1 and two of the handlers from District 2 shall serve for three years, and two of the handlers from District 1 and one of the handlers from District 2 shall serve for two years, with the determination of the term of each member to be made by lot.

(c) With respect to the term commencing in 2001 only, the alternate handler member who pays assessments exclusively on eggs or egg products produced outside of California shall serve for two years. Thereafter, the term of this member shall be as otherwise provided by this chapter. 

(d) An elected or appointed commissioner shall not serve more than three consecutive terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 121, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75063.
